Arkansas, session 2025, HB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Broadband Expansion
and Efficiency Act”.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Broadband communications services machinery and equipment.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Broadband communications services” means:
(A) A telecommunications service;
(B) A video programming service;
(C) An internet access service; and
*JLL183*
02/12/2025 5:46:32 PM JLL183

HB1469
(D) Any combination of a telecommunications service, a
video programming service, and an internet access service; and
(2)(A) “Machinery and equipment used in producing broadband
communications services” includes without limitation the following when used
in whole or in part to provide broadband communications services:
(i) Wires;
(ii) Cables;
(iii) Fiber;
(iv) Conduits;
(v) Antennas;
(vi) Poles;
(vii) Switches;
(viii) Routers;
(ix) Amplifiers;
(x) Rectifiers;
(xi) Repeaters;
(xii) Receivers;
(xiii) Multiplexers;
(xiv) Duplexers;
(xv) Transmitters;
(xvi) Circuit cards;
(xvii) Insulating and protective materials and
cases;
(xviii) Power equipment and backup power equipment;
(xix) Diagnostic equipment;
(xx) Storage devices;
(xxi) Modems;
(xxii) Other general central office or headend
equipment, including without limitation channel cards, frames, and cabinets;
(xxiii) Equipment used in successor technologies,
including without limitation items used to monitor, test, maintain, enable,
or facilitate equipment;
(xxiv) Machinery;
(xxv) Software;
(xxvi) Ancillary components; and
(xxvii) Accessories and other appurtenances.
02/12/2025 5:46:32 PM JLL183

HB1469
(B) “Machinery and equipment used in producing broadband
communications services” does not include:
(i) Personal consumer electronics, including without
limitation a smartphone, computer, and tablet; and
(ii) Consumer-grade modems and Wi-Fi routers.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of
machinery and equipment used in producing broadband communications services
are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and the
compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, §
26-53-101 et seq.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.























02/12/2025 5:46:32 PM JLL183